src/fst/affixes/pronouns.lexc
!Formerly ne-Misc_Pronouns1
LEXICON ne-Dem
: Misc_Pronouns_Pl ;
+Attr: ENDLEX ;
+Pl+Gen:%>нь K ;
+Pl+Dat:%>нень K ;
+Pl+Abl:%>%{дт%}О1 K ;
+Pl+Ill:%>с K ;


!LEXICON Misc_Pronouns_Sg
!  Misc_Pronouns_Indef ;
!+Sg+Nom+Def:%>сь  _OSH-Tenses1_Prep-SG ;
!+Sg+Gen+Def:%>нть K ;
!+Sg+Def+Dat:%>нтень K ;
!+Sg+Prl+Def:%>Г2а _KUDO-SgDet-PossPx ;
!+Sg+Abe+Def:%>вт{оеэ%}мО1 _KUDO-SgDet-PossPx ;
!+Sg+Abl+Def:%>%{дт%}О1 _KUDO-SgDet-PossPx ;
!+Sg+Tra+Def:%>кс _OSH-SgDet-PossPx ;
!+Sg+Ine+Def:%>с%{оэØ%} _KUDO-SgDet-PossPx ;
!+Sg+Ela+Def:%>ст%{оэØ%} _KUDO-SgDet-PossPx ;
!+Sg+Cmpr+Def:%>шка _KUDO-SgDet-PossPx ;
!+Sg+Tra+Def:%>V1кс _OSH-SgDet-PossPx ;

LEXICON _KUDO-Misc_Pronouns_Sg
  _KUDO-Misc_Pronouns_Indef ;
+Sg+Nom+Def:%>сь  _OSH-Tenses1_Prep-SG ;
+Sg+Gen+Def:%>нть K ;
+Sg+Dat+Def:%>нтень K ;
+Sg+Prl+Def:%>Г2а _KUDO-SgDet-PossPx ;
+Sg+Abe+Def:%>вт{оеэ%}мО1 _KUDO-SgDet-PossPx ;
+Sg+Abl+Def:%>%{дт%}О1 _KUDO-SgDet-PossPx ;
+Sg+Tra+Def:%>кс _OSH-SgDet-PossPx ;
+Sg+Ine+Def:%>с%{оэØ%} _KUDO-SgDet-PossPx ;
+Sg+Ela+Def:%>ст%{оэØ%} _KUDO-SgDet-PossPx ;
+Sg+Cmpr+Def:%>шка _KUDO-SgDet-PossPx ;


!LEXICON SgDet-PossPx
! PossPX1 ;
!+Sg+Def:%>нть K ; 

LEXICON _OSH-SgDet-PossPx
 _OSH-PossPX1 ;
+Sg+Def:%>нть K ; 

LEXICON _KUDO-SgDet-PossPx
@U.PossPx.Sg1@+PxSg1:@U.PossPx.Sg1@%>н%{ЬØ%}  _KAL-SecondaryDeclination ;
@U.PossPx.Sg1@+Use/NG+Err/Orth+Dial+PxSg1:@U.PossPx.Sg1@%>м    _KAL-SecondaryDeclination ;
@U.PossPx.Sg2@+PxSg2:@U.PossPx.Sg2@%>т%{ЬØ%}  _KIT-SecondaryDeclination ;
@U.PossPx.Sg2@+Use/NG+Err/Orth+Dial+PxSg2:@U.PossPx.Sg2@%>нт%{ЬØ%} _KIT-SecondaryDeclination ;
@U.PossPx.Sg3@+PxSg3:@U.PossPx.Sg3@%>нз%{оэØ%} _KUDO-SecondaryDeclination ;
@U.PossPx.Pl1@+PxPl1:@U.PossPx.Pl1@%>н{оеэ%}к _LAK-SecondaryDeclination ;
@U.PossPx.Pl2@+PxPl2:@U.PossPx.Pl2@%>нк   _LAK-SecondaryDeclination ;
@U.PossPx.Pl3@+PxPl3:@U.PossPx.Pl3@%>ст   _KIT-SecondaryDeclination ;
@U.PossPx.Pl3@+Use/NG+Err/Orth+Dial+PxPl3:@U.PossPx.Pl3@%>нст  _KIT-SecondaryDeclination ;
                  +Sg+Def:%>нть  K ;

!LEXICON Misc_Pronouns_Indef
!+Sg+Nom+Indef:  Tenses1_Prep-SG ;
!+Abl+Indef:%>%{дт%}О1 K ;
!+Gen+Indef:%>нь OBL-WITH-COP_KAL ; 
!+Dat+Indef:%>нень K ;
!+Ill+Indef:%>с K ;
!+Gen+Indef+Abl+Indef:%>нь%>стэ K ;
!+Gen+Indef+Ela+Indef:%>нь%>стэ K ;
!+Gen+Indef+Ine+Indef:%>нь%>сэ K ;
!+Gen+Indef+Ill+Indef:%>нь%>с K ; 
!+Gen+Indef+Abe+Indef:%>нь%>вт{оеэ%}мО1 K ;
!+Ine+Indef:%>с%{оэØ%} K ; 
!+Ela+Indef:%>ст%{оэØ%} K ;
!+Prl+Indef:%>Г2а K ;
!+Abe+Indef:%>вт{оеэ%}мО1 K ;
!+Tra+Indef:%>кс%{ЬØ%} K ;
!+Cmpr+Indef:%>шка K ; 


LEXICON _KUDO-Misc_Pronouns_Indef
+Sg+Nom+Indef:  _KUDO-Tenses1_Prep-SG ;
+Abl+Indef:%>%{дт%}О1 K ;
+Gen+Indef:%>нь OBL-WITH-COP_KAL ; 
+Dat+Indef:%>нень K ;
+Ill+Indef:%>с K ;
+Gen+Indef+Abl+Indef:%>нь%>стэ K ;
+Gen+Indef+Ela+Indef:%>нь%>стэ K ;
+Gen+Indef+Ine+Indef:%>нь%>сэ K ;
+Gen+Indef+Ill+Indef:%>нь%>с K ; 
+Gen+Indef+Abe+Indef:%>нь%>вт{оеэ%}мО1 K ;
+Ine+Indef:%>с%{оэØ%} K ; 
+Ela+Indef:%>ст%{оэØ%} K ;
+Prl+Indef:%>Г2а K ;
+Abe+Indef:%>вт{оеэ%}мО1 K ;
+Tra+Indef:%>кс%{ЬØ%} K ; !!2013-04-15 What is this
+Cmpr+Indef:%>шка K ; 


LEXICON Misc_Pronouns_Pl
+Pl+Nom+Indef:%>т%{ЬØ%} K ;
+Pl+Nom+Def:%>тнЕ3 K ; 
+Pl+Abl+Def:%>тнЕ3%>де K ;
+Pl+Abe+Def:%>тнЕ3%>с K ;
+Pl+Cmpr+Def:%>тнЕ3%>шка K ;
+Pl+Gen+Def:%>тнЕ3%>нь K ;
+Pl+Dat+Def:%>тнЕ3%>нень K ;
+Pl+Ill+Def:%>тнЕ3%>с K ;
+Pl+Ine+Def:%>тнЕ3%>сэ K ;
+Pl+Ela+Def:%>тнЕ3%>стэ K ;
+Pl+Tra+Def:%>тнЕ3%>кс K ;
+Pl+Prl+Def:%>тнЕ3%>ва K ;

!! DEMONSTRATIVE DERIVATION !!
LEXICON N2Dem-SE
+Der+Der/sje+Pron:%>се _KUDO-N2-Def-Declension ;
+Der+Der/sje+Pron:%>се PRON-DEM-CASE-DERIVATION ;
LEXICON PRON-DEM-CASE-DERIVATION
+Sg+Abl+Def:%>нденть K ;
+Sg+Ela+Def:%>ньстэнть K ;
+Sg+Ine+Def:%>ньсэнть K ;

LEXICON REL/INTERR_PRONOUNS
!ко+Pron+Rel:ко Indef_Pronouns-Cases ;
!зяродо+Adv+Rel+Abl:зяродо ENDLEX ;
!зяро+Adv+Rel+Ela:зяросто ENDLEX ;
ков+Adv+Rel+Lat:ков ENDLEX ;
косо+Adv+Rel+Ine:косо ENDLEX/COP4_OBL ;
косто+Adv+Rel+Ela:косто ENDLEX/COP4_OBL ;
кува+Adv+Rel+Prl:кува ENDLEX ;
зярдо+Adv+Rel+Sem/Time:зярдо ENDLEX ;

зяро+Adv+Rel:зяро ENDLEX ;
зяроксть+Adv+Rel+Qnt+Iter:зяроксть ENDLEX ;
зярс+Adv+Rel+Ill+Sem/Time:зярс ENDLEX ;

зярдонь+A+Rel+Abl+Sem/Time+Der/GenAttr:зярдонь ENDLEX ;
знярдонь+A+Rel+Abl+Der/GenAttr:знярдонь ENDLEX ;
знярдо+Adv+Rel+Sem/Time+Abl:знярдо ENDLEX ;
зняро+Adv+Rel:зняро ENDLEX ;

зняросто+Adv+Rel+Sem/Time+Ela:зняросто ENDLEX ;
знярс+Adv+Rel+Ill:знярс ENDLEX ;
зняро+Adv+Rel:зняро Indef_Pronouns-Cases ;
зяро+Adv+Rel:зяро _KUDO-Indef_Pronouns-Cases ;

!кодамо+A+Rel+Pl+Nom+Def:кодатнэ ENDLEX ;
!2017-11-05кона+Det+Rel+Nom+Sg:кона ENDLEX ;

мезе+Pron+Rel:мӒ4 PRON_MEZE_Cases ;
мезе+Pron:мӒ4 PRON_MEZE_Cases ;

мекс+Adv+Rel+Tra:мӒ4кс ENDLEX ;

мезе+Pron+Rel+Com:мӒ4знек ENDLEX ;



кона+Pron+Rel:кона REL/INTERR-PRON-CASES ;
кона+Pron+Rel:кона PRON-DEM_TE ;

!ко+Pron:ко Indef_Pronouns-Cases ;
!зяродо+Adv+Abl:зяродо ENDLEX ;
!зяро+Adv+Ela:зяросто ENDLEX ;
ков+Adv+Lat:ков ENDLEX ;
косо+Adv+Ine:косо ENDLEX/COP4_OBL ;
косто+Adv+Ela:косто ENDLEX/COP4_OBL ;
кода+Adv+Manner:кода ENDLEX ;
кува+Adv+Prl:кува ENDLEX ;

зяро+Adv:зяро ENDLEX ;
зяроксть+Adv+Iter:зяроксть ENDLEX ;
зярс+Adv+Ill+Sem/Time:зярс ENDLEX ;

зярдонь+A+Sem/Time+Der/GenAttr:зярдонь ENDLEX ;
знярдонь+A+Abl+Der/GenAttr:знярдонь ENDLEX ;
знярдо+Adv+Sem/Time+Abl:знярдо ENDLEX ;
зняро+Adv:зняро ENDLEX ;

зняросто+Adv+Sem/Time+Ela:зняросто ENDLEX ;
знярс+Adv+Ill:знярс ENDLEX ;
зняро+Adv:зняро ENDLEX ;
зяро+Adv:зяро ENDLEX ;


мезе+Pron+Sg+Nom+Indef:мӒ4зе ENDLEX ;
мезе+Pron:мӒ4зе PRON-INTERR-OBJ_MEZE ;
мезе+Pron+Sg+Nom+Def:мӒ4йсь K ;
мезе+Pron+SP+Ine+Indef:мӒ4йсэ K ;
мезе+Pron+SP+Ill+Indef:мӒ4йс K ;
!мезе+Pron+SP+Gen+Indef:мӒ4зень ENDLEX ;
!мезе+Pron+Pl+Nom+Indef:мезть ENDLEX ;
мезе+Pron+Orth/PhonInfl+Pl+Nom:мӒ4сть ENDLEX ;
мекс+Adv+Tra:мӒ4кс ENDLEX ;
!мезе+Pron+Abl:мезде ENDLEX ;
!мезе+Pron+Dat:мезнень ENDLEX ;
!мезе+Pron+Abl+Def:мезденть ENDLEX ;
!мезе+Pron+Ine:мейсэ ENDLEX ;

!мезе+Adn+Dep+Gen:мень ENDLEX ; !This one cannot take prefix
мезе+Pron+Com:мӒ4знек ENDLEX ;

мезе+Pron:мӒ4зь REL/INTERR-PRON-CASES_OSH ;

кона+Det:кона REL/INTERR-PRON-CASES ;


LEXICON REL/INTERR-PRON-CASES
+Pl+Nom+Indef:%>т%{ЬØ%} ENDLEX ; 

+SP+Ela:%>ст%{оэØ%} ENDLEX ;
+SP+Ine:%>с%{оэØ%} ENDLEX ;
+SP+Ill:%>с ENDLEX ;
+SP+Dat:%>нень ENDLEX ;
+SP+Abe:%>вт{оеэ%}мО1 ENDLEX ;
+SP+Abl:%>%{дт%}О1 ENDLEX ;
+Ela+Der/GenAttr:%>ст%{оэØ%}%>нь ENDLEX ;
+Abl+Der/GenAttr:%>%{дт%}О1%>нь ENDLEX ;
+Ine+Der/GenAttr:%>с%{оэØ%}%>нь ENDLEX ;
+SP+Gen:%>нь ENDLEX ;
!2009-09-29!+SP+Ine:%>с%{оэØ%} _KUDO-Tenses1 ;
+Ill:%>з%{оэØ%} ENDLEX ;
+Ill:%>з%{оэØ%}нь ENDLEX ;

+Sg+Nom+Def:%>сь ENDLEX ;
+Sg+Gen+Def:%>нть ENDLEX ;
+Sg+Dat+Def:%>нтень ENDLEX ;
+Pl+Nom+Def:%>тне ENDLEX ;
+Pl+Gen+Def:%>тне%>нь ENDLEX ;
+Pl+Abl+Def:%>тне%>%{дт%}О1 ENDLEX ;
+Pl+Dat+Def:%>тне%>нень ENDLEX ;
+Pl+Ine+Def:%>тне%>с%{оэØ%} ENDLEX ;
+Pl+Ela+Def:%>тне%>ст%{оэØ%} ENDLEX ;
+Pl+Ill+Def:%>тне%>с ENDLEX ;

+Pl+Nom+PxPl1:%>н{оеэ%}к ENDLEX ;
+Pl+Nom+PxPl2:%>нк ENDLEX ;
+Pl+Nom+PxPl3:%>ст ENDLEX ;

LEXICON REL/INTERR-PRON-CASES_OSH
+Pl+Nom+Indef:%>т%{ЬØ%} ENDLEX ; 
+SP+Ela+Indef:%>%{оеэØ%}ст%{оэØ%} ENDLEX ;
+SP+Ine+Indef:%>%{оеэØ%}с%{оэØ%} ENDLEX ;
+SP+Ill+Indef:%>%{оеэØ%}с ENDLEX ;
+SP+Tra+Indef:%>%{оеэØ%}кс ENDLEX ;
+SP+Dat+Indef:%>нень ENDLEX ;
+SP+Abe+Indef:%>вт{оеэ%}мО1 ENDLEX ;
+SP+Abl+Indef:%>%{дт%}О1 ENDLEX ;
+SP+Gen+Indef:%>%{оеэØ%}нь ENDLEX ;
+SP+Com+Indef:%>нек ENDLEX ;
+Ela+Der/GenAttr:%>%{оеэØ%}ст%{оэØ%}%>нь ENDLEX ;
+Abl+Der/GenAttr:%>%{дт%}О1%>нь ENDLEX ;
+Ine+Der/GenAttr:%>%{оеэØ%}с%{оэØ%}%>нь ENDLEX ;


+Sg+Nom+Def:%>%{оеэØ%}сь ENDLEX ;
+Sg+Gen+Def:%>%{оеэØ%}нть ENDLEX ;
+Sg+Dat+Def:%>%{оеэØ%}нтень ENDLEX ;

+Pl+Nom+Def:%>тне ENDLEX ;
+Pl+Gen+Def:%>тне%>нь ENDLEX ;
+Pl+Dat+Def:%>тне%>нень ENDLEX ;
+Pl+Abl+Def:%>тне%>де ENDLEX ;
+Pl+Ela+Def:%>тне%>стэ ENDLEX ;
+Pl+Ine+Def:%>тне%>сэ ENDLEX ;
+Pl+Ill+Def:%>тне%>с ENDLEX ;
+Pl+Lat+Def:%>тне%>в ENDLEX ;
+Pl+Tra+Def:%>тне%>кс ENDLEX ;
+Pl+Abe+Def:%>тне%>втеме ENDLEX ;
+Pl+Cmpr+Def:%>тне%>шка ENDLEX ;

LEXICON ASSOC-COLL-PRON-SG1
+Sg1:%>нень K ;
+Der/Cmpr+PxSg1:%>шка%>нень K ;
+Sg1+Ill:%>незэнь K ;

LEXICON COLL-PRON
зяронень+Pron+AssocColl:зяро ASSOC-COLL-PRON-SG1 ;
ламонень+Pron+AssocColl:ламо ASSOC-COLL-PRON-SG1 ;
аламонень+Pron+AssocColl:аламо ASSOC-COLL-PRON-SG1 ;
кавонень+Pron+AssocColl:каво ASSOC-COLL-PRON-SG1 ;
колмонень+Pron+AssocColl:колмо ASSOC-COLL-PRON-SG1 ;
ниленень+Pron+AssocColl:ниле ASSOC-COLL-PRON-SG1 ;
ветенень+Pron+AssocColl:вете ASSOC-COLL-PRON-SG1 ;
котонень+Pron+AssocColl:кото ASSOC-COLL-PRON-SG1 ;
сисемнень+Pron+AssocColl:сисем ASSOC-COLL-PRON-SG1 ;
кавксонень+Pron+AssocColl:кавксо ASSOC-COLL-PRON-SG1 ;
вейксэнень+Pron+AssocColl:вейксэ ASSOC-COLL-PRON-SG1 ;
кеменнень+Pron+AssocColl:кемен ASSOC-COLL-PRON-SG1 ;
кевейкеенень+Pron+AssocColl:кевейкее ASSOC-COLL-PRON-SG1 ;
кемгавтовонень+Pron+AssocColl:кемгавтово ASSOC-COLL-PRON-SG1 ;
кемголмовонень+Pron+AssocColl:кемголмово ASSOC-COLL-PRON-SG1 ;
кемнилеенень+Pron+AssocColl:кемнилее ASSOC-COLL-PRON-SG1 ;
кеветеенень+Pron+AssocColl:кеветее ASSOC-COLL-PRON-SG1 ;
кемготовонень+Pron+AssocColl:кемготово ASSOC-COLL-PRON-SG1 ;
кемзисемгенень+Pron+AssocColl:кемзисемге ASSOC-COLL-PRON-SG1 ;
кемгавксонень+Pron+AssocColl:кемгавксо ASSOC-COLL-PRON-SG1 ;
кевейксэнень+Pron+AssocColl:кевейксэ ASSOC-COLL-PRON-SG1 ;
комсенень+Pron+AssocColl:комсе ASSOC-COLL-PRON-SG1 ;
комсьвейкеенень+Pron+AssocColl:комсьвейкее ASSOC-COLL-PRON-SG1 ;
комськавтовонень+Pron+AssocColl:комськавтово ASSOC-COLL-PRON-SG1 ;
комськолмовонень+Pron+AssocColl:комськолмово ASSOC-COLL-PRON-SG1 ;
комсьнилеенень+Pron+AssocColl:комсьнилее ASSOC-COLL-PRON-SG1 ;
кеветеенень+Pron+AssocColl:кеветее ASSOC-COLL-PRON-SG1 ;
комськотовонень+Pron+AssocColl:комськотово ASSOC-COLL-PRON-SG1 ;
комсьсисемгенень+Pron+AssocColl:комсьсисемге ASSOC-COLL-PRON-SG1 ;
комськавксонень+Pron+AssocColl:комськавксо ASSOC-COLL-PRON-SG1 ;
комсьвейксэнень+Pron+AssocColl:комсьвейксэ ASSOC-COLL-PRON-SG1 ;
колоньгеменнень+Pron+AssocColl:колоньгемен ASSOC-COLL-PRON-SG1 ;
ниленьгеменнень+Pron+AssocColl:ниленьгемен ASSOC-COLL-PRON-SG1 ;
ведьгеменнень+Pron+AssocColl:ведьгемен ASSOC-COLL-PRON-SG1 ;
кодгеменнень+Pron+AssocColl:кодгемен ASSOC-COLL-PRON-SG1 ;
сизьгеменнень+Pron+AssocColl:сизьгемен ASSOC-COLL-PRON-SG1 ;
кавксоньгеменнень+Pron+AssocColl:кавксоньгемен ASSOC-COLL-PRON-SG1 ;
вейксэньгеменнень+Pron+AssocColl:вейксэньгемен ASSOC-COLL-PRON-SG1 ;
сядонень+Pron+AssocColl:сядо ASSOC-COLL-PRON-SG1 ;
кавтосядонень+Pron+AssocColl:кавтосядо ASSOC-COLL-PRON-SG1 ;
колмосядонень+Pron+AssocColl:колмосядо ASSOC-COLL-PRON-SG1 ;
нилесядонень+Pron+AssocColl:нилесядо ASSOC-COLL-PRON-SG1 ;
нилесядонень+Pron+AssocColl:нилесядо ASSOC-COLL-PRON-SG1 ;
ветесядонень+Pron+AssocColl:ветесядо ASSOC-COLL-PRON-SG1 ;
котосядонень+Pron+AssocColl:котосядо ASSOC-COLL-PRON-SG1 ;
сиземзядонень+Pron+AssocColl:сиземзядо ASSOC-COLL-PRON-SG1 ;
кавксосядонень+Pron+AssocColl:кавксосядо ASSOC-COLL-PRON-SG1 ;
вейксэсядонень+Pron+AssocColl:вейксэсядо ASSOC-COLL-PRON-SG1 ;
тёжаннень+Pron+AssocColl:тёжан ASSOC-COLL-PRON-SG1 ;
